Utah statutes.
17B-2a-807.   Public transit district board of trustees -- Appointment -- Apportionment -- Qualifications -- Quorum -- Compensation -- Terms.

(1) (a)  If 200,000 people or fewer reside within the boundaries of a public transit district, the board of trustees shall consist of members appointed by the legislative bodies of each municipality, county, or unincorporated area within any county on the basis of one member for each full unit of regularly scheduled passenger routes proposed to be served by the district in each municipality or unincorporated area within any county in the following calendar year.

(b)  For purposes of determining membership under Subsection (1)(a), the number of service miles comprising a unit shall be determined jointly by the legislative bodies of the municipalities or counties comprising the district.

(c)  The board of trustees of a public transit district under this Subsection (1) may include a member that is a commissioner on the Transportation Commission created in Section 72-1-301 and appointed as provided in Subsection (11), who shall serve as a nonvoting, ex officio member.

(d)  Members appointed under this Subsection (1) shall be appointed and added to the board or omitted from the board at the time scheduled routes are changed, or as municipalities, counties, or unincorporated areas of counties annex to or withdraw from the district using the same appointment procedures.

(e)  For purposes of appointing members under this Subsection (1), municipalities, counties, and unincorporated areas of counties in which regularly scheduled passenger routes proposed to be served by the district in the following calendar year is less than a full unit, as defined in Subsection (1)(b), may combine with any other similarly situated municipality or unincorporated area to form a whole unit and may appoint one member for each whole unit formed.

(2) (a)  Subject to Section 17B-2a-807.5, if more than 200,000 people reside within the boundaries of a public transit district, the board of trustees shall consist of:

(i)  11 members:

(A)  appointed as described under this Subsection (2); or

(B)  retained in accordance with Section 17B-2a-807.5;

(ii)  three members appointed as described in Subsection (4); and

(iii)  one voting member appointed as provided in Subsection (11).

(b)  Except as provided in Subsections (2)(c) and (d), the board shall apportion voting members to each county within the district using an average of:

(i)  the proportion of population included in the district and residing within each county, rounded to the nearest 1/11 of the total transit district population; and

(ii)  the cumulative proportion of transit sales and use tax collected from areas included in the district and within each county, rounded to the nearest 1/11 of the total cumulative transit sales and use tax collected for the transit district.

(c)  The board shall join an entire or partial county not apportioned a voting member under this Subsection (2) with an adjacent county for representation.  The combined apportionment basis included in the district of both counties shall be used for the apportionment.

(d) (i)  If rounding to the nearest 1/11 of the total public transit district apportionment basis under Subsection (2)(b) results in an apportionment of more than 11 members, the county or combination of counties with the smallest additional fraction of a whole member proportion shall have one less member apportioned to it.

(ii)  If rounding to the nearest 1/11 of the total public transit district apportionment basis under Subsection (2)(b) results in an apportionment of less than 11 members, the county or combination of counties with the largest additional fraction of a whole member proportion shall have one more member apportioned to it.

(e)  If the population in the unincorporated area of a county is at least 140,000, the county executive, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, shall appoint one voting member to represent the population within a county's unincorporated area.

(f)  If a municipality's population is at least 160,000, the chief municipal executive, with the advice and consent of the municipal legislative body, shall appoint one voting member to represent the population within a municipality.

(g) (i)  The number of voting members appointed from a county and municipalities within a county under Subsections (2)(e) and (f) shall be subtracted from the county's total voting member apportionment under this Subsection (2).

(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2)(l) and (10), no more than one voting member appointed by an appointing entity may be a locally elected public official.

(h)  If the entire county is within the district, the remaining voting members for the county shall represent the county or combination of counties, if Subsection (2)(c) applies, or the municipalities within the county.

(i)  If the entire county is not within the district, and the county is not joined with another county under Subsection (2)(c), the remaining voting members for the county shall represent a municipality or combination of municipalities.

(j) (i)  Except as provided under Subsections (2)(e) and (f), voting members representing counties, combinations of counties if Subsection (2)(c) applies, or municipalities within the county shall be designated and appointed by a simple majority of the chief executives of the municipalities within the county or combinations of counties if Subsection (2)(c) applies.

(ii)  The appointments shall be made by joint written agreement of the appointing municipalities, with the consent and approval of the county legislative body of the county that has at least 1/11 of the district's apportionment basis.

(k)  Voting members representing a municipality or combination of municipalities shall be designated and appointed by the chief executive officer of the municipality or simple majority of chief executive officers of municipalities with the consent of the legislative body of the municipality or municipalities.

(l)  The appointment of voting members shall be made without regard to partisan political affiliation from among citizens in the community.

(m)  Each voting member shall be a bona fide resident of the municipality, county, or unincorporated area or areas which the voting member is to represent for at least six months before the date of appointment, and shall continue in that residency to remain qualified to serve as a voting member.

(n) (i)  All population figures used under this section shall be derived from the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census.

(ii)  If population estimates are not available from the United States Bureau of Census, population figures shall be derived from the estimate from the Utah Population Estimates Committee.

(iii)  All transit sales and use tax totals shall be obtained from the State Tax Commission.

(o) (i)  The board shall be apportioned as provided under this section in conjunction with the decennial United States Census Bureau report every 10 years.

(ii)  Within 120 days following the receipt of the population estimates under this Subsection (2)(o), the district shall reapportion representation on the board of trustees in accordance with this section.

(iii)  The board shall adopt by resolution a schedule reflecting the current and proposed apportionment.

(iv)  Upon adoption of the resolution, the board shall forward a copy of the resolution to each of its constituent entities as defined under Section 17B-1-701.

(v)  The appointing entities gaining a new board member shall appoint a new member within 30 days following receipt of the resolution.

(vi)  The appointing entities losing a board member shall inform the board of which member currently serving on the board will step down:

(A)  upon appointment of a new member under Subsection (2)(o)(v); or

(B)  in accordance with Section 17B-2a-807.5.

(3)  Upon the completion of an annexation to a public transit district under Chapter 1, Part 4, Annexation, the annexed area shall have a representative on the board of trustees on the same basis as if the area had been included in the district as originally organized.

(4)  In addition to the voting members appointed in accordance with Subsection (2), the board shall consist of three voting members appointed as follows:

(a)  one member appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(b)  one member appointed by the president of the Senate; and

(c)  one member appointed by the governor.

(5)  Except as provided in Section 17B-2a-807.5, the terms of office of the voting members of the board shall be four years or until a successor is appointed, qualified, seated, and has taken the oath of office.

(6) (a)  Vacancies for voting members shall be filled by the official appointing the member creating the vacancy for the unexpired term, unless the official fails to fill the vacancy within 90 days.

(b)  If the appointing official under Subsection (1) does not fill the vacancy within 90 days, the board of trustees of the authority shall fill the vacancy.

(c)  If the appointing official under Subsection (2) does not fill the vacancy within 90 days, the governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall fill the vacancy.

(7) (a)  Each voting member may cast one vote on all questions, orders, resolutions, and ordinances coming before the board of trustees.

(b)  A majority of all voting members of the board of trustees are a quorum for the transaction of business.

(c)  The affirmative vote of a majority of all voting members present at any meeting at which a quorum was initially present shall be necessary and, except as otherwise provided, is sufficient to carry any order, resolution, ordinance, or proposition before the board of trustees.

(8)  Each public transit district shall pay to each voting member:

(a)  an attendance fee of $50 per board or committee meeting attended, not to exceed $200 in any calendar month to any voting member; and

(b)  reasonable mileage and expenses necessarily incurred to attend board or committee meetings.

(9) (a)  Members of the initial board of trustees shall convene at the time and place fixed by the chief executive officer of the entity initiating the proceedings.

(b)  The board of trustees shall elect from its voting membership a chair, vice chair, and secretary.

(c)  The members elected under Subsection (9)(b) shall serve for a period of two years or until their successors shall be elected and qualified.

(d)  On or after January 1, 2011, a locally elected public official is not eligible to serve as the chair, vice chair, or secretary of the board of trustees.

(10)  Except as otherwise authorized under Subsection (2)(g) and Section 17B-2a-807.5, at the time of a voting member's appointment or during a voting member's tenure in office, a voting member may not hold any employment, except as an independent contractor or locally elected public official, with a county or municipality within the district.

(11)  The Transportation Commission created in Section 72-1-301:

(a)  for a public transit district serving a population of 200,000 people or fewer, may appoint a commissioner of the Transportation Commission to serve on the board of trustees as a nonvoting, ex officio member; and

(b)  for a public transit district serving a population of more than 200,000 people, shall appoint a commissioner of the Transportation Commission to serve on the board of trustees as a voting member.

(12) (a) (i)  Each member of the board of trustees of a public transit district is subject to recall at any time by the legislative body of the county or municipality from which the member is appointed.

(ii)  Each recall of a board of trustees member shall be made in the same manner as the original appointment.

(iii)  The legislative body recalling a board of trustees member shall provide written notice to the member being recalled.

(b)  Upon providing written notice to the board of trustees, a member of the board may resign from the board of trustees.

(c)  Except as provided in Section 17B-2a-807.5, if a board member is recalled or resigns under this Subsection (12), the vacancy shall be filled as provided in Subsection (6).



Amended by Chapter 106, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

